California, session 20252026, AB424.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11834.33 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:11834.33. When the department receives a complaint against an alcohol or other drug recovery or treatment facility licensed pursuant to this chapter, or against a facility alleged to be in violation of Section 11834.30, from a member of the public, the department shall do both of the following:(a) Within 10 days of the date of the complaint, provide notice to the person filing the complaint that the complaint has been received.(b) Upon closing the complaint, provide notice to the person filing the complaint that the complaint has been closed and whether the department found the facility to be in violation of this chapter.